District of Columbia statutes.
19-315

No distinction between whole- and half-blood.

There is no distinction between the kindred of the whole- and the half-blood.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 699, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 19-315.
1973 Ed., § 19-315.